California, session 20252026, AB1556.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Substance use can precipitate homelessness and homelessness worsens substance use.(b) California has the largest homeless population in the United States at 187,084 individuals as of 2024.(c) Overdose deaths among homeless Americans from drugs and alcohol surged 488 percent between 2010 and 2020.(d) Recovery housing programs that operate in a manner consistent with the Interagency Council on Homelessness guidance document “Implementing Recovery Housing in Alignment with California Housing First Requirements” published in July 2025 can provide a high degree of quality and positive outcomes for program participants, fulfill a unique and specific role within a community’s homelessness services and behavioral health care systems, help provide meaningful choice in housing settings for people with substance use disorders, and should be a component of any continuum of care that needs this type of resource to prevent and end homelessness in its community.(e) According to guidance in October 2025 from the California Interagency Council on Homelessness, “the homelessness response system must be equipped to support people in their recovery journey.”(f) Recovery housing programs have a responsibility to protect and maintain the drug-free environments that are sought and expected by residents and their families.SEC. 2. Division 10.95 (commencing with Section 11999.45) is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:DIVISION 10.95. Recovery Housing11999.45.For the purposes of this division, “recovery housing” means housing in a residence that serves individuals who seek a cooperative living arrangement that supports personal recovery from a substance use disorder and that does not require licensure or does not provide licensable services, pursuant to Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 11834.01) of Part 2 of Division 10.5, who are experiencing, or who are at risk of experiencing, homelessness and who opt into a drug-free environment. Recovery housing may include, but is not limited to, residential dwellings commonly referred to as “sober living homes,” “sober living environments,” or “unlicensed alcohol- and drug-free residences.”11999.45. For the purposes of this division, “recovery housing” has the same meaning as in paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) of Section 8256 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, but is limited to housing provided through state programs as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 8255 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.11999.50. (a) To be eligible for state funding, a recovery housing program shall meet all of the following requirements:(1) Satisfy the core components of Housing First pursuant to Section 8255 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(2) Use substance use-specific, peer support, and physical design features that support individuals and families on a path to recovery from substance use disorders.(3) Emphasize abstinence.(4) Offer tenants permanent housing or program participants interim housing.(5) Provide nonclinical services that are participant driven and tailored to participant needs and facilitates voluntary access and linkages to licensed treatment providers and services. This paragraph does not authorize a recovery housing program to provide clinical treatment services unless it is separately licensed or certified pursuant to applicable state law. services.(6) Unless participation in recovery housing is court ordered, residency is initiated by the tenant or program participant and the tenant, the program participant, or their family is offered at least one harm-reduction housing placement option and the resident or family chooses a recovery housing program instead of housing offering a harm-reduction approach. The harm-reduction housing placement option and the recovery housing program do not have to be available for move in at the same time.(7) Relapse is not, unless there is another lease violation, grounds for eviction from recovery housing and residents receive relapse support, consistent with the return-to-use policy described in paragraph (11).(8) Support, and does not prevent or restrict, a resident’s access to, or use of, medications prescribed for behavioral or physical health conditions, including, but not limited to, medications prescribed for the treatment of mental health conditions and substance use disorders, including, but not limited to, alcohol use disorder and opioid use disorder. Medications may include, but are not limited to, buprenorphine, methadone, and naltrexone. The residence does not directly provide or prescribe medications for the treatment of mental health conditions or substance use disorders unless the entity operating the residence is separately licensed or certified by the State Department of Health Care Services or another applicable licensing authority. disorders.(9) Provide emergency preparedness and overdose prevention and response training to staff and residents and make overdose reversal medication available and readily accessible to staff and residents onsite.(10)Have consent and confidentiality protections for its residents consistent with applicable state and federal law, including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act (HIPAA) and (commencing with Section 2.1) Part 2 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations. (11)(10) Adopt and maintain a written return-to-use policy that is approved by an organization currently recognized as an affiliate of the National Alliance for Recovery Residences (NARR) for consistency with NARR best practices. practices, or a similar entity. The return-to-use policy shall include all of the following:(A) A clear articulation of the recovery housing’s policy on the possession and use of alcohol, cannabis, and other controlled substances.(B) Contact information for treatment providers, mutual aid supports, and recovery coaches that can be contacted for additional support.(C) An explanation that the housing program’s standard response to a resident’s return to substance use will not be punitive in nature.(D) An explanation of the steps the housing program will take to address a resident’s return to use.(E) An explanation of actions by the resident that may result in eviction or discharge, including, but not limited to, repeated program violations.(F) (i) An explanation that if a tenant of permanent recovery housing or permanent supportive housing is no longer interested in living in the housing, or is at risk of eviction for violating the return-to-use policy, the housing program shall allow the resident to reside in the housing until the operator secures the tenant another permanent housing placement option operated with harm-reduction principles that is also permanent housing and provides a comparable level of supportive services.(ii) If the tenant rejects the offer of a housing placement option described in clause (i), the operator may evict the tenant.(iii) (I) If an unlawful detainer proceeding is initiated for an alleged violation of a lease provision agreement or program requirement, the housing program operator shall submit documentation of the alleged lease violation to the local grantor of state funds.(II) The local grantor shall submit a copy of the documentation and a summary of all alleged violations reported pursuant to this clause to the appropriate state agency that administers the housing funds.(III) The local grantor shall include the information described in subclause (II) in its annual reporting as required by existing program requirements.(G) (i) An explanation that if a program participant in an interim recovery housing program is no longer interested in living in the housing, or is at risk of discharge for violating the return-to-use policy, the housing program shall allow the program participant to remain in the housing until the operator secures the program participant placement in interim housing operated with harm-reduction principles that is also interim housing and provides a comparable level of supportive services.(ii) If the resident rejects the offer of another housing placement option described in clause (i), the operator may discharge the program participant.(iii) (I) If a program participant is discharged for an alleged violation of any program requirement, the housing program operator shall submit documentation of the alleged violation to the local grantor of state funds.(II) The local grantor shall submit a copy of the documentation and a summary of all alleged violations reported pursuant to this clause to the appropriate state agency that administers the housing funds.(III) The local grantor shall include the information described in subclause (II) in its annual reporting as required by existing program requirements.(12)(11) Disclose applicable rules, behavioral expectations, participation requirements, and program policies to prospective residents or participants through lease agreements, intake materials, resident handbooks, program agreements, or other program documentation, as appropriate.(12) The residence meets the requirements for recovery housing programs listed in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 8256 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.(b) For purposes of state and federal housing law, including, but not limited to, the federal Fair Housing Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 3601 et seq.) and the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), a recovery housing program is a housing provider and not a treatment facility solely on the basis of providing nonclinical services.(c) Participation in recovery housing programs and eligibility for state or local funding shall not be conditioned on the provision of clinical treatment services by the residence. requiring the recovery housing to provide clinical treatment services.